Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5315.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 28. (1) The attorney general shall prosecute and defend all actions in the supreme court , in which the this state shall be is interested , or a party. ; he (2) The attorney general may, in his the attorney general's discretion, designate one of the an assistant attorneys attorney general to be known as the solicitor general, who, under his the attorney general's direction, shall have has charge of such the causes in the supreme court described in subsection (1) and shall perform such performs other duties as may be assigned to him; and the solicitor general. (3) The attorney general shall, also, when requested by the governor , or either branch of the legislature, and may, when in his own judgment the interests of the state require it, intervene in and appear for the people of this state in any other court or tribunal in this state, in any cause or matter, civil or criminal, in which the people of this state may be a party or interested.